Massachusetts, session 194th, SD2982.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 34 of chapter 53 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, after the word “candidate,” the words “the
street and number, if any, of his residence” and inserting in place thereof the following words:–
“the city or town for candidates for state office, or the ward, precinct or district for candidates for
local office, as applicable”.
SECTION 2. Section 106 of chapter 53 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, after the words “shall be printed,” the words “the street and number, if
any, of his residence” and inserting in place thereof the following words:– “the city or town for
candidates for state office, or the ward, precinct or district for candidates for local office, as
applicable”.
of 2

SECTION 3. Section 41 of chapter 54 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by:
(a) striking out, after the words “shall be added,” the words “the name of the city or town
where he resides, with the name of the street and number, if any, of his residence” and inserting
in place thereof the following words:– “the city or town in which he resides”;
(b) striking out, after the words “shall be added,” the words “the name of the street on
which he resides, with his street number, if any” and inserting in place thereof the following
words:– “the ward or precinct in which he resides”;
(c) striking out, after the words “shall be added,” the words “the name of the street on
which he resides, with his street number, if any” and inserting in place thereof the following
words:– “the precinct or district in which he resides”.
SECTION 4. Section 42 of chapter 54 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by striking out, after the words “shall be placed first on the ballot in alphabetical order
according to their surnames; and”, the words “the names and addresses of the candidates” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:– “the names and municipalities of residence of
the candidates, or the ward, precinct or district in which they reside, as applicable”.
of 2